Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.020

Warrant, how vacated.

A warrant issued as prescribed in RCW 6.32.010 may be vacated or modified by the judge making the same, or by the court out of which the execution was issued, upon giving three days' notice to the opposite party.

[ 1893 c 133 s 2; RRS s 614.]